Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1610
Completion certification, defined.

Completion certification means a statement signed by the design engineer, certifying the completion of work on a dam in conformance with the approved plans and specifications.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 10.